District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.14

Payment of water rents from Washington Aqueduct into General Fund.

All water rents derived from the Washington Aqueduct shall be paid into the General Fund of the District of Columbia as established by the Revenue Funds Availability Act of 1975 [D.C. Law 1-42].

R.S., D.C., § 217
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 3(e), 22 DCR 6313
1981 Ed., § 43-1533.
1973 Ed., § 43-1524.